Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2179.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1601(a) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1601. Ordinances.--(a) The board of supervisors may adopt ordinances in which general or specific powers of the township may be exercised, and, by the enactment of subsequent ordinances, the board of supervisors may amend, repeal or revise existing ordinances. All proposed ordinances, whether original, amended, repealed, revised, consolidated or codified, shall be published not more than sixty days nor less than seven days before passage at least once in one newspaper circulating generally in the township. [Public notices shall include either 12345678910111213141516171819 the full text or a brief summary of the proposed ordinance which lists the provisions in reasonable detail and a reference to a place within the township where copies of the proposed ordinance may be examined.] Publication of a proposed ordinance shall include the following:(1) The full text of the proposed ordinance or the title and a brief summary of the proposed ordinance. A brief summary shall include, as applicable, a description of any:(i) adoption, amendment or repeal of any tax, fee, charge or assessment;(ii) adoption, amendment or repeal of a regulation that provides for an offense or civil or criminal penalty; and(iii) provision or covenant that:(A) provides for the payment or disbursement of funds for goods, services or contractual obligations;(B) restricts funds for a specific purpose or obligation; or(C) pledges funds for a specific purpose or obligation.(2) A reference to a place within the township where a copy of the proposed ordinance may be examined.(3) A reference to the publicly accessible Internet website, if any, where the full text of the proposed ordinance may be examined.* * *(a.2) If a brief summary published under subsection (a) is the subject of a legal challenge, the summary shall be legally sufficient if the summary:(1) contains the information required under subsection (a)(1); and(2) is made available for examination at the time of publication in conformity with subsection (a)(2) and (3).20260HB2179PN2833 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a.3) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(1), the requirements of this section shall not supersede the publication or notification requirements of a proposed ordinance under the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the "Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code."* * *Section 2. The publication requirements under this act shall apply to the advertisement of an ordinance occurring after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2179PN2833 - 3 - 12345678910